dev/adjective/adjective.bn.dix
  <!-- ধর্মপ্রাণ; ধর্মপ্রাণ -->
    <pardef n="ধর্মপ্রাণ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পচা; পচা -->
    <pardef n="পচা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- তুচ্ছতর; তুচ্ছ -->
    <pardef n="তুচ্ছ/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কমলা; কমলা -->
    <pardef n="কমলা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অবস্থিত; অবস্থিত -->
    <pardef n="অবস্থিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কৃত্রিম; কৃত্রিম -->
    <pardef n="কৃত্রিম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সহজতর; সহজ -->
    <pardef n="সহজ/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তর</l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- একাধিক; একাধিক -->
    <pardef n="একাধিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দীর্ঘতম; দীর্ঘ -->
    <pardef n="দীর্ঘ/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বড়; বড় -->
    <pardef n="বড়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মারাত্মক; মারাত্মক -->
    <pardef n="মারাত্মক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পরিষ্কার; পরিষ্কার -->
    <pardef n="পরিষ্কার__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নীল; নীল -->
    <pardef n="নীল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আত্মঘাতী; আত্মঘাতী -->
    <pardef n="আত্মঘাতী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সক্রিয়; সক্রিয় -->
    <pardef n="সক্রিয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিশিষ্ট; বিশিষ্ট -->
    <pardef n="বিশিষ্ট__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মূল; মূল -->
    <pardef n="মূল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দীর্ঘতর; দীর্ঘ -->
    <pardef n="দীর্ঘ/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিশাল; বিশাল -->
    <pardef n="বিশাল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সহজ; সহজ -->
    <pardef n="সহজ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিষ্ঠুর; নিষ্ঠুর -->
    <pardef n="নিষ্ঠুর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত; ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত -->
    <pardef n="ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিলাসবহুল; বিলাসবহুল -->
    <pardef n="বিলাসবহুল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিদ্রোহ; বিদ্রোহ -->
    <pardef n="বিদ্রোহ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বহুজাতিক; বহুজাতিক -->
    <pardef n="বহুজাতিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিদেশী; বিদেশী -->
    <pardef n="বিদেশী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অনুমেয়; অনুমেয় -->
    <pardef n="অনুমেয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অসহ্য; অসহ্য -->
    <pardef n="অসহ্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মাসিক; মাসিক -->
    <pardef n="মাসিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কঠিন; কঠিন -->
    <pardef n="কঠিন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আর্থিক; আর্থিক -->
    <pardef n="আর্থিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মসৃণতম; মসৃণ -->
    <pardef n="মসৃণ/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- স্বীকৃত; স্বীকৃত -->
    <pardef n="স্বীকৃত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অদ্ভুত; অদ্ভুত -->
    <pardef n="অদ্ভুত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সমৃদ্ধতম; সমৃদ্ধ -->
    <pardef n="সমৃদ্ধ/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সমৃদ্ধতর; সমৃদ্ধ -->
    <pardef n="সমৃদ্ধ/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মসৃণতর; মসৃণ -->
    <pardef n="মসৃণ/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রভাবশালী; প্রভাবশালী -->
    <pardef n="প্রভাবশালী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- রহস্যময়; রহস্যময় -->
    <pardef n="রহস্যময়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিকল্প; বিকল্প -->
    <pardef n="বিকল্প__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উদ্ভটতম; উদ্ভট -->
    <pardef n="উদ্ভট/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিবিধ; বিবিধ -->
    <pardef n="বিবিধ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অনিচ্ছুক; অনিচ্ছুক -->
    <pardef n="অনিচ্ছুক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ধর্মপ্রাণ"><i>ধর্মপ্রাণ</i><par n="ধর্মপ্রাণ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পচা"><i>পচা</i><par n="পচা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="তুচ্ছতর"><i>তুচ্ছ</i><par n="তুচ্ছ/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কমলা"><i>কমলা</i><par n="কমলা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অবস্থিত"><i>অবস্থিত</i><par n="অবস্থিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কৃত্রিম"><i>কৃত্রিম</i><par n="কৃত্রিম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সহজতর"><i>সহজ</i><par n="সহজ/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="একাধিক"><i>একাধিক</i><par n="একাধিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দীর্ঘতম"><i>দীর্ঘ</i><par n="দীর্ঘ/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বড়"><i>বড়</i><par n="বড়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মারাত্মক"><i>মারাত্মক</i><par n="মারাত্মক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পরিষ্কার"><i>পরিষ্কার</i><par n="পরিষ্কার__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নীল"><i>নীল</i><par n="নীল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আত্মঘাতী"><i>আত্মঘাতী</i><par n="আত্মঘাতী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সক্রিয়"><i>সক্রিয়</i><par n="সক্রিয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশিষ্ট"><i>বিশিষ্ট</i><par n="বিশিষ্ট__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মূল"><i>মূল</i><par n="মূল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দীর্ঘতর"><i>দীর্ঘ</i><par n="দীর্ঘ/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশাল"><i>বিশাল</i><par n="বিশাল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সহজ"><i>সহজ</i><par n="সহজ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিষ্ঠুর"><i>নিষ্ঠুর</i><par n="নিষ্ঠুর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত"><i>ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত</i><par n="ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিলাসবহুল"><i>বিলাসবহুল</i><par n="বিলাসবহুল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিদ্রোহ"><i>বিদ্রোহ</i><par n="বিদ্রোহ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বহুজাতিক"><i>বহুজাতিক</i><par n="বহুজাতিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিদেশী"><i>বিদেশী</i><par n="বিদেশী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অনুমেয়"><i>অনুমেয়</i><par n="অনুমেয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অসহ্য"><i>অসহ্য</i><par n="অসহ্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মাসিক"><i>মাসিক</i><par n="মাসিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কঠিন"><i>কঠিন</i><par n="কঠিন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আর্থিক"><i>আর্থিক</i><par n="আর্থিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মসৃণতম"><i>মসৃণ</i><par n="মসৃণ/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="স্বীকৃত"><i>স্বীকৃত</i><par n="স্বীকৃত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অদ্ভুত"><i>অদ্ভুত</i><par n="অদ্ভুত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সমৃদ্ধতম"><i>সমৃদ্ধ</i><par n="সমৃদ্ধ/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সমৃদ্ধতর"><i>সমৃদ্ধ</i><par n="সমৃদ্ধ/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মসৃণতর"><i>মসৃণ</i><par n="মসৃণ/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রভাবশালী"><i>প্রভাবশালী</i><par n="প্রভাবশালী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="রহস্যময়"><i>রহস্যময়</i><par n="রহস্যময়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিকল্প"><i>বিকল্প</i><par n="বিকল্প__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উদ্ভটতম"><i>উদ্ভট</i><par n="উদ্ভট/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিবিধ"><i>বিবিধ</i><par n="বিবিধ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অনিচ্ছুক"><i>অনিচ্ছুক</i><par n="অনিচ্ছুক__adj"/></e>
